patterns/hyph-cs-sojka.tex
st3rín
st3roc
st3ros
st3rua
st4run
st4rus
st3ruu
st3rv
st3řc
2sts
s4tse
2stt
s3tun
s3tuš
s3tvej
s3tvym
s3tvýh
s3tyř
2stž
2sť.
s2ťf
s2ťk
2sťm
2sťt
su2b3
su3cc
su3chd
su3ché
su3chí
su3chů
su3chú
su3cs
su1h
su3kl
su4ll
s3ult
sup3l
sup3r
3suri.
su2s
sú3c
sú4ch.
s1úp
sú3r
sút1
2sü
s2va
s3vak
s2vä
s4vá
s2vč
s3ve
svet3
s2vě
s2vé
s2ví
s2vl
s2vo
s2vö
s2vr
sv2š
s2vu
s2vů
s2vv
s2vy
s1we
swig3
s1wr
sy1c
2syj
sy3kl
synas3
sys3
s2z
s3zaj
sz3ká
sz4kl
s4zz
s2žv
1š
šab3l
šab3o
š4a1c
šaj4t
ša3rva
ša2s
šav3ača
šav3aj
šav3am
šav3aní
šav3ať
šav3e
šav3é
šav3i
šav3o
šav3r
šav3ý
2šb
š1c
šci2
š1č
2šč.
šče4p
š1d
še3chl
šeh2
še4ja
še1o2
šet3ř
še1u
še3vj
še1z
šf2
š1hr
šif3r
ši4hn
š2ik
ši3rí
ši3rv
š1j
š1ká
š1kd
š1ké
š3ko.
š3koh
š4kor
š2kr
šk2s
š4kub
š4kuj
š4kuľ
š4kum
šk2v
š1ky
š3lat
š3láň
š3láv
š3lej
š3ler
š1lí
š3lo
š3ls
š3lš
š1lu
š1lú
š3ly
š2lý
š1ľ
š2ľo
š2ľu
š2ľú
š2má
š2md
š2me
š2mo
š2mu
š1n
š3ní
2šňa
š2ňů
š1oa
šo4dó
šous3
šp2
š2pi
š2pl
šp3le
š2po
š2pr
2špy
2š3s
šs3kí
2šš
šš1t
2št.
š3tač
š1tá
2štb
š1tě
štib4
š3til
štk3no
2štm
2štn
š3tná
š3tné
2štň
št2r
š3tri
št4rua
št1ř
2šts
2štš
š2tu
štul3p
št2v
št3ve
2šť.
š2ťc
š2ťk
2šťs
šu1k
šup3l
šuš3t
šů1
3šú1
šú3c
š1úp
šú4re
š1úv
š4va
š2ve
š2vé
š2vi
š2ví
š3vo
š2vr
š2vu
š2vv
š2vý
š2z
1ta.
ta1a
3taba
3t4ac
ta4ct
t4ač.
3tačk
t3ačt
3tadí
t3adv
tae4g
tae4n
3tafa
taf3l
3tagl
3tagn
3tahl
t4ai
ta3is
1taj
3takou
3tal.
3talg
ta3ll
3tam
3tan.
3tane
3taně
3tank
3taný
t1ao
3tapá
3tapu
t3arb
3tari
3tart.
1tař
3tasi
tasr3
tas3t
tast3r
3taša
t3aše
tat3h
3tatni
t3atř
1tau
t4av
3tav3s
3tavý
1taw
1tay
t4az
ta4zb
1tá.
1tác
1tád
tá4fl
1ták
tá3kt
3tálk
3táln
tálš3
3tánec
3táre
3tári
3tárk
3társ
1tář
3táto
3tázi
2tb
tb3r
tb4rn
2t1c
t3ce
t4ch.
tch3al
t1č
t2čá
2tči
2tčí
t3čk
tč2t
2t1d
1tda
tdo2
1te
te2a
te3am
te3dd
te3dg
te3dř
te3em
2teh
te4h3l
te4hm
te4hn
te4hů
te4ja
tek3l
te3ll
4teľt
te3nne
te3ob
te3om
tep3l
3tera
ter3ag
ter3ax
ter3ega
ter3et
t3ese
tes3er
tes3t
tet3r
tet3ř
t3exu
te3zz
1tě.
těd1
1těj
3těni
3těrá
těs3
3těšno
3těšný
1tět
3těže
1té
2të
2tf
tfoli3
t3ft
2tg
2th.
1tha
t3haj
th3ap
t3hav
t1hä
1thá
1thc
1the
t3hek
t1hí
th3j
th3la
th3lo
2thm
2thn
1thq
1th4r
2ths
1tht
1ti
ti3age.
ti3agi
ti3ak
ti3al
ti3am
ti3ar
tias4k
ti3at
tib2
ticy4
ti3ek
ti3ep
ti3et
ti3ev
ti4gn
ti3gp
ti4hn
ti1i
t3imp
t3ind
t3inti
ti3ob
ti3of
ti3ok
ti3ot
4tipá
2tiť
3tíc
1tíč
1tík
1tín
t4ja.
t4jam
t4jaž
t2j1o
2t1k2
3tkn
t3ko
tko3ng
tko3w
t3ku
t2kv
t3ky
1tl.
t3laj
t3lam
t3las
t3lav
4tlá
t3lác
t3lák
t3lán
t3láv
4tld
t1le
3tlem
3tler
3tleř
t1lě
2t1lé
2tli
2t1lí
2tln
t3lov
t1lú
t3ly
2tlý
t1ľ
4tmá
3tmc
t2md
t2mě
2tmé
2tmi
1tmí
t2ml
2t3mo
t2mů
t2my
2tmý
2t1n
3tnf3
2tň
1to
to3ai
to3an
to3ar
to3at
t3obc
to4ck
to3ct
tocy3
to3dv
to1e2
t3oft
toh2
t3ohm
to4iz
to3kt
to1o2
4topéh
to3pt
top3up
torek3
tour3
to2w
to1z2
t4oze
toz4ny
1tó
2tp
tp2c
t3pi
3tpk
tp2r
t2p2s
3tr.
3t3ra.
tr3adm
3trak
3t3ral
t3ramo
3tranc
3trav
t3ravá
t3ravě
t3rax
t3raz
t1rä
3trá.
t3ráč
3trák
t3rál
3tráts
1trb
tr3cl
3trč.
t3rea
3t3red
3trej
t3rejm
3trel
t4repi
t3reši
t3reší
t4rett
1tré
3tri.
3tria
3triá
t4rico
3trič
3trid
3trif
t4rihá
3trii
3trik
3trin
3tris
3trit
3triť
3triu
t1rj
3trma
3trmá
t4rn
3tro.
t3robi
t4robo
tro3cku
tro3ckú
t4rocu
t3roč
t3rod
3trog
3troh
3troi
tro4iz
t4roj
t3rok
3trol
t3romě
3t3ron
t3roo
t3ropo
t3ropr
t4ropu
3t3ror
4trosc
3t3roš
3trov
3tro3z
3t3rož
3tró
1trô
t3rôž
1trš
3trua
3t3ruá
tru3e
t3rui
3t3rum.
3truu
1trů
1trv
1t1ry
try3o
t4ryp
t4rys
t4ryw
1trý
t3rýh
tr3zb
t2rž
2tř.
1třa
3třáb
1třc
3tře.
t3řej
3třeni
t3ření
3třenk
3třet
4třež
t3řič
tři4hn
t3řim
t3řiš
3třit
t3řiv
3tří.
t3říč
t3řím
t3řín
t3říň
4tříz
3tříž
tř2m
1třo
t3ř2t
t1řu
2tř3v
1tŕ
2ts
t2sb
ts4chi
t2sč
3tse.
t2sf
ts3hd
4tsi
ts3kí
ts4ml
4tsp
ts2t
t2su
t3suri
ts4vi
2tš
tš1k
t1t
2tt.
t4táb
2ttb
2t2t1h
tt1l
t4tla
t4tlo
2t2tm
2t3tn
2tts
t2tt
t2tů
2tt2v
2ttw
t2tx
t2u
1tu.
tu3cht
3tuda
3tudný
tuf2
3tuh
tu3hi
1tuj
1tul
3tupim
1tur
1tus
tut3l
t2ú
1tú.
1tú3c
tú1č
1túd
1túf
tú1h
1tú1l
3tún
1túň
1túr
tú3ra
tú3re
tú3ro
tú1ř
tü1c
1tüt
4tvák
t3váv
t2v1d
t3vi
t2ví
3tvín
t3vírk
tv3out
t2vr
t2vu
t2vů
t3vy
tvý2
2t1w
3tw.
twist4
1ty
ty4chi
2tyd
2tyď
tyns3
tyo1
2tyř
ty3th
tyz3n
1tý
tý2b
4týlá
2tz.
2tza
tz4ak
t2zá
2tzk
1tzo
t2zů
t1ž
1ť
2ťad
ťa3f
ťa2s
ťá1h2
2ťb
ť1c
ť1č
ťdi1
2ťh
ťin3
ť1j
ť1k
ť1l
2ť1n
ťo4c
2ť2p
ť3pät
ť3pl
2ťs1
ťs4et
2ťš1
ť1t
ťu1c
ť1úp
ť1z2
ua1a
u1ak
4uane
u3a3nh
u1ap
uare3
u1au
uays4
u2bd
u3ben
u2bg
u3bi
ubi3ó
ubi3u
ub4jo
u4bk
u2bl
ub3la
ub3lá
ub3lo
u3blů
ubs2
ubš3t
u4bt
ub1w
u3chô
u3chvo
u4cké
uckt4
u4cký
uc1l
u2cľ
u2cp
uc1r
u4ct
1ucť
1u2čm
u3čná
uda3i
u3dda
ud4jo
ud3oč
ud3ra
ud3ro
u1d1ř
udš3t
u1dž
uď3al
uď3an
ue1c
u1e2d
ueeze3
u3els
u2em
u3erh
u3esp
u3etr
u1eu
uf1l
ugeb3
ug1l
u1ha
u1há
u1hé
u3híd
u4hl.
u3hla
uh3le
uh3lo
u3hls
u4hlu
3uhlú
u1hm
uh4nov
u1ho
u1hr
uh3raď
u1hř
uh3ře
u1hů
uh3va
u3hvě
uh3vi
u1hy
u1hý
u1j
u2jc
u2j2m
u4job
uj3ok
u1ká
u1ké
u3kl.
uk3le
uk3lé
uk3lov
u3klu
u1k2m
uk2ň
u1ko
3ukoj
3ukra
uk3re
uk3rů
uk3ře
u1ky
u1ký
u1la
u1lá
u1le
u1lé
ul1h
2u1lí
ulk3r
u4llen
u4llr
ull3up
u1lo
uls2
ulš2
ul3tl
ult4rač
u1lu
u1lú
u2md2
u2m1h
u2ml
um3la
um3lo
u2mm
u2mn
um3rá
1umř
u2mů
unen3a
ung3l
un2h
3unij
3univ
un3on
unp3r
u1nr
uns3kí
un4tz
2unu
un3up
4uny
uny3c
u2ňe
u2ňě
u2ňm
u2ňt
u2ňu
u1o2b
u1o2c
u1o2k
uom3i
uos3t
u1o2t
u1o2ž
upč4no
1upg
up3lí
upoh3
u2pp
upp4li
upr2
up3rat
up3rb
up3rel
up4ri
u2ps
ups3ta
up3t
u1ra
ura3a
ur3asi
u1rá
u4ráš
1urč
u1re
4u1ré
urg3r
uri3e
u1rí
ur4ju
u1ro
urš3t
u1ru
u2rv
u3rvy
u1ry
u1rý
u1ř
u3řc
u2řk
u2sb
us3dp
3usedl
use3o
u2sf
u2sh
ush3r
us3kí
us3ko
us4kri
us3ky
us3ký
us3le
us4lím
us4lít
us2m
3usmá
us3my
us3omy
1us2p
us3pek
us3pu
us3tč
ust3ig
us3tp
ust4ric
ust3rů
us4ts
us4tv
ust3yk
us4vi
u3sy
u2sz
uš3k3v
uš4mi
uš3tí.
uš3tr
u1t
ut3ha
u2tl
uto3a
ut3ra
ut3rej
ut3rí
ut3ru
u2tŕ
utš2
u2tt
ut4tl
u2tz
u2ťa
u2ťk
u2ťm
u2ťt
u1ur
uus1
u1u2t2
u1u2ž
u1ú2
u2vč
u2vš
u1x
ux3ar
u2xb
u2xl
u2xt
u2xů
u2xy
u1ya
u1yá
u1yb
u1ye
u1yf
u1yg
u1y1i
u1yk
u1yl
u1yr
u1ys
u1yt
u1yu
uz4a
uza4mč
u4zdi
u3zdr
uzd3ř
uz3m
uz4ma.
uz4má
uz4me
uz4mí
uz4mo
uz4mu
u3zna
u1zr
u1z2v
už4m
užs3kí
užš3t
1ůa
ů1c
ů2ck
ů1čc
ů2čt
ůdo1
ů1ď
ů1hl
ů1ho
ůh3v
ů1hy
ů2ja
ů2jm
ů1k
ů1la
ůl3d2
ů1le
ů2lě
ůl1h
ů2ll
ů1lo
ůl3ob3
ůls2
ů1lu
ů2ňu
ů1ra
ů1ro
ů1ru
ů1r2v
ů1ry
ů1ř
ů4řím
ů2řk
ů2sí
ů3ste
ůs2v
ů2š1k
ů1ta
ů1tě
ů1tí
ů1tr
ů1tu
ů2vá
ů2vč
ů2vu
ůz4ku
ů1zr
ů1zv
úb1r
ú2c2
ú3car
ú3cas
ú3ch
ú4chl
ú4chn
ú4cn
ú3cs
1úč
ú3čs
ú1dí
úd3oč
ú1dp
úd3ro
úd4rom
údz4
ú3dži
ú1e
úf1l
ú2gh
úh3lo
ú1hž
úi2
új2
úk2
ú2kl
ú3kt
ú4kup
úl3au
úleh3
ú1lh
ú3ly
ú2ľo
ú2mě
ú2mr
ún3au
úos1
ú2pa
ú2pě
ú2pí
1úpr
ú3pt
1úpu
ú1rá
úr2c
ú4rn
ú1rp
ú1ru
ú1rv
ú1ry
ú1řa
ú1ří
ús2c
ús4kom
ú2s2p
ú2ss
ús3tě
ús3tri
ú2sť
ús2v
ús1ž
2úš
úš3kr
ú2šť
ú1ta
ú1tá
úti2
ú2tm
ú2to
ú1tr
út3rop
út3ru
ú1tu
út2v
ú2ťk
ú1u
ú1úp
ú2vč
úv1l
úz3n
úz1r
ú1zt
1úzu
ú1zv
1úž
üb1l
ü2f
ü2gn
ü1ha
ü1la
ü3lem
ü1ll
ü4lln
ü1lö
üns1
ü3p
ür1z2
ü1ta
üth1
ü1z
1v
va1a
va3cl
4vad3r
va3dř
va2f1
va3inl
3valc
2vap
vas3t
va2ť
va4zb
váh4l
vá2ň
vás3
2vb
vbu4l
2v1c
vceh3
v2cr
3v2ct
v2ča
2včá
2vče
2vči
2včí
2včo
v3dam
vd3au
3v2dá
2vde
2vdi
v1dm
vd3r
ve3dv
veh3l
veh4la
veh4lu
veh4n
ve4ja
ve3ll
vep3ř
ves3l
veš3k
ve3tk
vet3l
vet3ý
ve3vn
ve1z
vě1h
věs3l
3věta
2vg2
2v1ha
v1hr
vib1
vi3ch
vi3g
vig4a
vi4hn
vik3l
3viln
vip3r
vi3pt
vi3sk
v3itr
2viž
2víl
3vín
3víran
3víř
2v1j
vj3os
2v1k
3vkl
3vkr
v3lat
v3le.
v3leh
v3lem
vl2h
v1lí
v3lju
v1lo
v1lu
2vlý
vm2
3v4mě
2v1n
3vnouč
3vnuč
2vň
vňá3
v3ochr
vo3cka
vo3cko
vo3cku
vod3r
voe3i
voh2
vo3id
vo3in
vo3ió
voi4z
v4ol
vol4a
vol3c
vo1o2
v3opá
vop4l
3vorc
vost4réh
voš3t
vot3r
vou3
vo3učn
vo3uky
v4ov
3voz
2vp2
vp3d
vp3li
vp4ly
vp3ri
vp3ro.
v2ps
v3ran
v3raň
vraš3
v3ray
v3rel
vreš3
v3rín
v1ro
vrs3e
vrt3r
vrůs3
v1ry
v1rý
vřeš3
v1ři
v3řín
v2řo
2vs2
3vse
3vsí
v2sr
vst3r
vst4rč
vst4ro
vš2
v2ša
v2še
v2ši
v4šud
3v2t
v3tes
vt3lá
v2u
vu3om
vu3ov
vup2
vus3p
vuš1
3vůre
3vú
vú3c
vú1č
vú1d
vú1h
vú1i
vú1k
v1úp
vú3re
vú3ro
vú2s
vy1
vy4cl
vyč2
vyd2
vye2
vy3m4
vy3ň
vyo2
vy3p2
vys4cho
vys4ka
vys4ke.
vys4ko
vys4ku.
vys4la
vys4lá
vys4li
vys4n
vys4s
vys4te
vys4tri
vy3t2
vyz4d
vý3t2
v2z2
vz4d
vze1
vz4li
vz3ra
vž2
wa1a
wa3ch
wa2f
wa2g
1wa2h
wá2
wá3d
w2c
w1d
1wee
we3em
we2h
wei4
w3end
we2s
we3sk
wf2s
w2gh
w1ha
w1hf
w1hi
w1hl
w1hm
w1ho
wie4
wi2l
w2j
w1l
wnt4
1wo
wo2l
1wra
w1re
wres3
w1ro
w2ru
w1ry
w2sb
ws1c
w2s1l
ws2p
ws2t
ws3tar
w1t
wto2
w2tz
1wu.
1w1up
1wů
1wü
w1y
wy4ch
1xa
xa3ch
xa2k
2x1ap2
xas1
x3aze
1xá
xbo1
x1c
2x1d
1xe
x1ed
xe4ja
xe1k2
x1ex
1xé
2xf
2xg
2x1h2
1xi
xi3et
1xí
x1j
2x1k
xk3lú
x1l
2xm
2x1n
1xo
xot4r
2xp2
x1r
x1ř
2xs2
x1t
xt3ali
x2tm
xt3rí
2xtu
xtú1
xty1
1xu
xu1c
2xup
2x1w
xy1
1xyl
2x1z2
yaa2
ya1c
ya2g
y1a4k
yak3i
yak3u
y3alo
y1am
y3and
y3ank
y3anó
ya3on
y1ar
ya2s
y3asa
y3avy
yaz4
y2bd
yb3lí
yb3rá
y1cé
y4ch.
y3chí
y2ck4
yc1l
y1cr
y1ct
yčis3
yč2m
yč2t
y1d
y2dh
ydro3
1yec
yei3
ye2k3
yek4ová
y3eló
y3eni
y1e2s
y1et
y3eur.
y3eva
1yé2
ygo1
y1h2
y4ing
y1it
y1j
y2jc
yj2m
yj4st
y1ká
y1kd
y1ké
y1kk
y3kl.
y4klin
y4kló
y1kľ
y1km
y1ko
y1kv
y1ky
y1l
yl3al
yl3ami
yl3es
yl3ety
ylg2
yl2h
yl3ora
y3lsm
yluš3
yľs4ké
ym2h
y3mk
y2mn
ym4r
2yn
yna3c
yn3ar
ynd4ro
yne4i
yn3est
yns3ko
ynš3p
y2ňď
y2ňe
y2ňu
yo1a
yo2b1
yo3bl
yo2č
yop2
yo3pt
yos2
yos4tr
yot2
yot3a
y1ou
y2ov
yp4ad
y3pc
yp2d
yph3l
yp2l
yp3ré
yp3rí
yp3rú
yp3rý
yp3ře
yp3ři
y1q
y1r
y2rg
y2rm
yro3bt
y2rr
yrůs3
yr2v
y1ři
yřk2
yř3kl
y2s3f
y2s1h
y3si
ys4kak
ys4ki
ys3kl
ys3km
ys4kr
ys4kuj
ys4kut
ys3ký
ys3le
ys3lí
ys3lo
ys3lu
ys4m
ys4ně
ys4ni
ys2p
ys4si
ys4sí
ys4so
ys3ta
ys4tel
ys4tie
ys4tih
ys4tiz
ys4tiž
ys4tín
ys4tís
ys4toj
ys4top
ys4tou
yst3rel
ystřih4n
ys4týl
ys2ť
ys4vi
y3sy
yš4kv
yš2ň
yš4pu
yš2ť
y1ta
y1tá
y1tě
y3thi
y3tho
y3thu
y1tí
yto3w
y1tr
yt3ra
ytres3
yt3rí
yt3rop
yt4ryc
yt3rý
y1tř
y1tu
y1tú
yt2v
y2ťm
y2ťt
y1u
yu2č
yu2d
y2ue
y2ui
y2ul
yu2m
yu3nn
yu2r
yus3p
yu2z
y1ú2
1yü
yv2d
y3v2s
y1w2
y2xe
y1z2
y3zá
y4zbi
yz3c
yz3de
yz3di
yz3h
y2zl
yz3la
yz3lo
y2z3m
yz4mi
yz3ne.
yz3nem
yz3net
yz3nit
yz3no
yz3nu
yz4o
y1ž
yž2d
y2ž1l
ýb1l
ý4blu
ý3chl
ý3cht
ý3chž
ý1čc
ý1č2n
ý1č2t
ý1d
ýg1l
ý1h
ý3hk
ý1j
ý1k
ý1l
ý2ll
ý2ľo
ý2mn
ý2mr
ýns2
ýpo4čta
ý1r
ý4ráš
ý2rl
ý2rm
ý1ř
ý2řk
ýs3ko
ýs3ky
ýs3ký
ýs2t4
ý2sť
ýš3k
ýš1l
ýš1t
ý2šť
ý1ta
ý1tá
ý3tc
ý1tě
ý1th
ý1tí
ýt3k
ý1tl
ý1t2r
ý1tu
ý1tů
ý1u2
ý1z2
ý3ze
ý2zg
ýz3ko
ý2z3l
ý2zm
ýz3ne
ýz3ně
ýz3ni
ýz3ní
ý1žk
ý1žň
ý1žů
1za
za1a4
za1c
za3d
za1e
za3f
2zag
zah2
za3jd
z3a3k
za1ľ
za3m
za1o
za3p2
z3ara
zas2
za3t
zat4ř
za3ť
za1u
za1ú
zaú4c
za1y
za3z4
za1ž
1zá1
zá4čk
zád2
záj2
zá2ň
3záp
3zář
zás3tri
záš2
záz2
2zba
zbab3r
zbank3
zb2l4
zbr2
z2bů
z2by
zbyst3
z2bý
2z1c
z3ci
zcu1
z2cy
z1č2
2zd.
2zdi
z3dí.
3zdíč
3zdít
z1dm
2zdn
2zdň
zd2p
1z1dř
zd3řu
2zds
z3dú
zd2v
2zď
z1ďu
1ze
zea2
ze1c
ze3čt
ze3dm
ze3dř
ze3em
zeh2
ze4ja
ze3jm
ze1k
ze3kb
ze3ls
z3emis
ze3p2
zes2
zes4r
ze3tl
ze3tn
ze3vn
ze1z2
1zé
z3fa
zfo4
z3ga
1zgi
z1h4
z3hk
z2hu
z2hy
1zi
zi3am
zi3ar
zi3ch
zi3et
zi4gn
zi4hn
zi1i
zi3kn
z3ilu
z3int
zi3ob
zi3od
zi3ok
zi3one
zi3op
1zí
zít3o
2z3ja
zj3at
zjis3
z2ju
z1jv
zk2
z1ké
z1kl
z1km
z1ko
zko3r
zk4rú
z4kum
zku3r
z4kus
z4kuš
z1kv
z1ky
z1ký
z1l
1zl.
z4lák
1zlb
3zleně
z4lev
z3li.
z3lin
1zlp
2zlu
zm2
zmos3
zmuch3
zm3vp
z4myk
z2na
z3nad
3znám
z3ně.
2zné
z3nis
3znivk
2zno
z1nô
z3nt
2z3ny
2zný
2zň
z3ňo
1zo
zo1a
z3o4bl
z3ob3r
z3obs
zo3cka
zo3cku
zoe2
2z1oh
zok3l
zo2o
z3orá
z3orz
zos4k
zos3t3ř
zo2š1
zoš3k
zot2
zot4roc
1zó
zp2
zpin3
z2ps
z3pt
z2pů
1z2py
z3rado
z3raď
3zraň
z3ras
z3razi
z3rám
z3ráž
z3rea
z3reš
1zrn
zro3cko
zro3cku
z3ruč
z3ruk
z1rý
z1řa
z3řed
z3řeš
z3řez
1zřj
1z2řo
2zs2
zsä1
z2sc
z2sf
zst3re
4zš2
zt2
z1th
z1tí
z1tr
z1tř
z4tu
z1tú
z3tva
z4tvr
2zť
1zu
zu1c
zu1h
zus2
2z1uz
1zů1
z1ú
zú4ch
zú2d
zú2ň
zú2p
z2úž
zv2
z3vít
1z2vu
z2vů
zvys4k
z1w
1zy
zy1k
zyňs3
1zý
3zz.
2zze
z2zé
1zzi
2zzl
zz4le
z3zlí
2zzm
2zz1r
zz1t
z1z2ú
1z2zy
z1ž
1ža
2žah
žas3e
žas3lé
žas3om
ž1až
1žá
žáb1
2žáh
2žb2
3žběta
ž1c
ž1č
ž1d
ždu3c
ž2dž
1že
žeb1
že2h
žeh3l
že3ho
že3hr
že4ja
žem1
že1o
žer3t
žez3
že3zm
1žé
žg4
1žh2
1ži
žih3l
ži3ou
ži3rj
1ží
žj1
ž1k
ž2kl
ž1le
žli1
2ž1lí
1žlo
1žlu
1žmb
žmú1
ž1n
3žnin
3žnou
1žo
žon2
1žr
ž2ra
ž1re
ž1ry
2žs
žs2s
2žš
žš2ť
2ž1t
1žu
žu1d
žuš4t
1žú
žú3c
žú3ra
žú3re
žú3ro
1ž2v
ž3vi
}
